Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2525.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of July 18, 1974 (P.L.483, No.174), known as The Institutional Assistance Grants Act, is repealed:[Section 2. Legislative Findings.--The General Assembly has found and hereby declares that:(a) The Commonwealth is committed to the development and preservation of a planned and diverse system of higher education which encompasses both public and independent institutions. The percentage of students attending independent institutions in the Commonwealth is forty-two per cent (42%), which figure is much 12345678910111213141516171819202122 higher than the national average of twenty-four per cent (24%). Independent institutions make a significant contribution to higher education in the Commonwealth and it is in the public interest to facilitate optimum utilization of all higher education resources in the Commonwealth.(b) Tuition and fees charged to students by independent institutions, even when financed by various types of student financial aid, do not cover the cost of education. Many independent institutions are, therefore, presently faced with serious financial difficulties. These difficulties inhibit their ability to provide higher education to the Commonwealth students and, therefore, impair the provision of higher education in the Commonwealth and increase the burden on public institutions.(c) The institutional assistance grants on behalf of Pennsylvania scholarship students attending independent institutions authorized herein are designed to assure maximum educational choice by preserving the quality of independent institutions and will tend to moderate the costs charged to students at independent institutions.]Section 2. The definitions of "assistance grant," "assistance grant fund" and "State-owned institutions" in section 3 of the act are amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *["Assistance grant" shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400)."Assistance grant fund" shall mean the aid received pursuant to this act on behalf of Pennsylvania State scholarship students by each eligible institution.]* * *20260HB2525PN3418 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "State-owned institutions" shall mean the [fourteen Pennsylvania State colleges and university.] institutions that are part of the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the "Public School Code of 1949 ." * * *Section 3. Sections 5 and 6 of the act are amended to read:Section 5. Institutional Assistance Grants.--For [the academic year beginning on or about September 1, 1974,] each year funding is available, the agency shall allot, on behalf of each Pennsylvania State scholarship student attending the eligible institution as certified pursuant to section 4, an assistance grant [as defined in section 3, such allotment] to be made to each eligible institution from the funds appropriated to the agency [pursuant to section 10.] for the purpose of this act. An eligible institution shall use an assistance grant under this section to supplement each Pennsylvania State scholarship student's grant amount and reflect the supplement on each Pennsylvania State scholarship student's tuition bill as an "Institutional Assistance Grant provided by the Commonwealth."Section 6. [Assistant Grant Fund.--The Institutional Assistance Grant Fund shall be maintained in a separate account and shall not be commingled with other funds of the eligible institution. The moneys in the fund may be used only for, or in connection with, expenses incurred by the eligible institution for educational cost. Each institution shall cause an audit of such separate account to be made annually, which audit shall indicate the manner in which the moneys in the assistance grant fund have been expended. A copy of the audit shall be forwarded to the agency.] Accountability.--The agency shall audit the 20260HB2525PN3418 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 records of an eligible institution that receives an assistance grant to ensure compliance with this act. The agency shall publish an annual report on the publicly accessible Internet website of the agency that includes the distribution and use of assistance grant money and any other information that the agency determines necessary for the implementation of this act.Section 4. Section 10 of the act is repealed:[Section 10. Appropriation.--The sum of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000), is hereby appropriated to the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency for the purposes, and administration, of this act for the fiscal year July 1, 1974 to June 30, 1975.]Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2525PN3418 - 4 - 12345678910111213